Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB69.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Affordable housing" means housing that is eligible for state or federal
funds to support its construction, repair, or rehabilitation as a result of its
affordability;
(b) "Affordable housing funds" means state or federal funds that directly
finance, in whole or in part, the:
1. Construction, repair, or rehabilitation of affordable housing; or
2. Rental of housing by eligible low-income persons; and
(c) "Agency":
1. Means any state agency, local government, quasi-governmental entity,
or other governmental entity in the Commonwealth that expends
affordable housing funds; and
2. Includes the Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(2) Notwithstanding any law or administrative regulation to the contrary, an agency
that expends affordable housing funds shall expend:
(a) At least ninety percent (90%) of those funds on single-family detached
housing; and
(b) No more than ten percent (10%) of those funds on multifamily housing;
in any given fiscal year.
(3) The requirement in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Supersedes any condition contained in a grant or other appropriation; and
(b) Does not apply to funds expended by an agency other than affordable
housing funds, including but not limited to funds used to defray its
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/6/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 995
administrative costs and to provide educational or other programs.
Section 2. Whereas the use of state and federal funds on affordable housing is
having significant impacts on the character of areas that have traditionally contained
single-family homes, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its
passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/6/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed